Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6056.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8a. (1) An employer shall do both of the following: (a) Display the poster described in subsection (2) at each of the employer's work sites in a prominent location that is accessible to each of the employer's employees. (b) Make the poster described in subsection (2) available to each of the employer's employees in a digital format via an internal website or email. (2) The department of labor and economic opportunity shall create and make available to employers a poster that describes all of the rights granted to an employee under the national labor relations act of 1935, 29 USC 151 to 169. The poster must be in English and any other language requested by a labor organization or employer. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall use publications from the National Labor Relations Board in creating the poster and may request assistance from the National Labor Relations Board in creating the poster. (3) An employer that violates subsection (1) is subject to a civil fine as follows: (a) For a first violation, $5,000.00. (b) For a second or subsequent violation, $10,000.00. (4) The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general may bring an action to collect a civil fine under this section. A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund.